Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2
SOUTHERN GROWTH POLICIES AGREEMENT

12-10-20. Agreement enacted and entered into by State of Georgia; text of agreement.

The Southern Growth Policies Agreement is enacted into law and entered into by the State of Georgia with any and all states legally joining therein in accordance with its terms. The agreement is substantially as follows:

"SOUTHERN GROWTH POLICIES AGREEMENT

12-10-21. Bylaws and amendments filed with Division of Archives and History.

Copies of bylaws and amendments to be filed pursuant to Article VI (j) of the agreement shall be filed with the Division of Archives and History.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 622, § 2; Ga. L. 2002, p. 532, § 2.)

12-10-22. Effect of article on participation with states adopting agreement before July 1, 1973.

Nothing contained in the Southern Growth Policies Agreement shall in any event be construed to terminate the participation of this state with any state which adopted the Southern Growth Policies Agreement prior to July 1, 1973, except that the provisions of Article XII (c) shall govern with respect to the continuance of states as parties thereto after December 31, 1973.

(Ga. L. 1973, p. 622, § 3.)